Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6001
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-6001 to 44-6026 shall be known and may be cited as the Insurers and Health Organizations Risk-Based Capital Act.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 13;

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 32;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 3.